Tennessee, session 114, SB2313.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 7-82-307(a)(2)(D), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(D) This subdivision (a)(2) does not prohibit a commissioner from serving for
more than two (2) consecutive terms in counties having a population, according to the
2020 federal census or any subsequent census, of:
not less than nor more than
28,800 28,900
42,700 42,800
50,400 50,500
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2313
010910
- 1 -